Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-404.01
Hunting permit; person with developmental
disability; license-purchase exemption certificate; application; contents.

A hunting permit
may be issued to any person who has a developmental disability and who has
a license-purchase exemption certificate issued by the commission authorizing
such person to purchase a hunting permit. The commission may adopt and promulgate
rules and regulations to establish forms and procedures for the issuance of
license-purchase exemption certificates. Any license-purchase exemption certificate
issued pursuant to this section shall be issued at no cost to the person who
has a developmental disability and shall clearly state on its face that the
holder must at all times while hunting be accompanied as described in subsection
(4) of section 37-413. No license-purchase exemption certificate shall be
issued to any person who has been found by any court or mental health board
to pose a current danger to himself or herself or others. As part of the application
process for a license-purchase exemption certificate, a person who has a developmental
disability shall present the commission with a written authorization signed
by a physician indicating that the person who has a developmental disability
is at all times capable of understanding and following directions given by
another person and that the person who has a developmental disability is not
a danger to himself or herself or others while engaged in hunting with a firearm.
For purposes of this section, developmental disability has the same meaning
as in section 83-1205.

Laws 2014, LB699, § 2.